District of Columbia statutes.
31-1401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

“Company” means any person engaging in or proposing or attempting to engage in any transaction or kind of insurance or surety business and any person or group of persons who may otherwise be subject to the insurance laws of the District of Columbia, including fraternal benefit associations and excluding the District of Columbia Life and Health Guaranty Association and the District of Columbia Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association.

(2A)

“Department” means the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(3)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(4)

“Examiner” means any individual or firm having been authorized by the Mayor to conduct an examination under this chapter.

(5)

“Person” means any individual, aggregation of individuals, trust, association, partnership, or corporation, or any affiliate thereof.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-49, § 2, 40 DCR 6110
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(ff)(1), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 39, 45 DCR 745
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(j), 51 DCR 2817
1981 Ed., § 35-3601.
D.C. Law 15-166, in par. (2A), substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(j) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 10-49, the Law on Examinations Act of 1993, see Mayor’s Order 94-54, March 7, 1994 ( 41 DCR 1433).
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 10 of D.C. Law 10-49 provided that the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 15 of Title 1 subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, 2001 Ed., issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.